Illinois, session 104th, HB4443.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 and by changing Section 6z-112 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Illinois Future Fund. 8    (30 ILCS 105/6z-112)9    Sec. 6z-112. The Cannabis Regulation Fund.10    (a) There is created the Cannabis Regulation Fund in the 11State treasury, subject to appropriations unless otherwise 12provided in this Section. All moneys collected under the 13Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act shall be deposited into the 14Cannabis Regulation Fund, consisting of taxes, license fees, 15other fees, and any other amounts required to be deposited or 16transferred into the Fund.17    (b) Whenever the Department of Revenue determines that a 18refund should be made under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 19Act to a claimant, the Department of Revenue shall submit a 20voucher for payment to the State Comptroller, who shall cause 21the order to be drawn for the amount specified and to the 22person named in the notification from the Department of   HB4443- 2 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1Revenue. This subsection (b) shall constitute an irrevocable 2and continuing appropriation of all amounts necessary for the 3payment of refunds out of the Fund as authorized under this 4subsection (b).5    (c) On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 6Department of Revenue shall prepare and certify to the State 7Comptroller the transfer and allocations of stated sums of 8money from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to other named funds 9in the State treasury. The amount subject to transfer shall be 10the amount of the taxes, license fees, other fees, and any 11other amounts paid into the Fund during the second preceding 12calendar month, minus the refunds made under subsection (b) 13during the second preceding calendar month by the Department. 14The transfers shall be certified as follows:15        (1) The Department of Revenue shall first determine 16    the allocations which shall remain in the Cannabis 17    Regulation Fund, subject to appropriations, to pay for the 18    direct and indirect costs associated with the 19    implementation, administration, and enforcement of the 20    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act by the Department of 21    Revenue, the Department of State Police, the Department of 22    Financial and Professional Regulation, the Department of 23    Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, the 24    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the 25    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.26        (2) After the allocations have been made as provided   HB4443- 3 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), of the remainder 2    of the amount subject to transfer for the month as 3    determined in this subsection (c), the Department shall 4    certify the transfer into the Cannabis Expungement Fund 5    1/12 of the fiscal year amount appropriated from the 6    Cannabis Expungement Fund for payment of costs incurred by 7    State courts, the Attorney General, State's Attorneys, 8    civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 9    Interest Attorney Assistance Act, and the Department of 10    State Police to facilitate petitions for expungement of 11    Minor Cannabis Offenses pursuant to Public Act 101-27, as 12    adjusted by any supplemental appropriation, plus 13    cumulative deficiencies in such transfers for prior 14    months.15        (3) After the allocations have been made as provided 16    in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection (c), the 17    Department of Revenue shall certify to the State 18    Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 19    amounts that the Department of Revenue determines shall be 20    transferred into the following named funds according to 21    the following:22            (A) 2% shall be transferred to the Drug Treatment 23        Fund to be used by the Department of Human Services 24        for: (i) developing and administering a scientifically 25        and medically accurate public education campaign 26        educating youth and adults about the health and safety   HB4443- 4 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1        risks of alcohol, tobacco, illegal drug use (including 2        prescription drugs), and cannabis, including use by 3        pregnant women; and (ii) data collection and analysis 4        of the public health impacts of legalizing the 5        recreational use of cannabis. Expenditures for these 6        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.7            (B) 8% shall be transferred to the Local 8        Government Distributive Fund and allocated as provided 9        in Section 2 of the State Revenue Sharing Act. The 10        moneys shall be used to fund crime prevention 11        programs, training, and interdiction efforts, 12        including detection, enforcement, and prevention 13        efforts, relating to the illegal cannabis market and 14        driving under the influence of cannabis.15            (C) 25% shall be transferred to either the 16        Criminal Justice Information Projects Fund or the 17        Illinois Future Fund according to the following 18        schedule: 19                (i) Until the fiscal year beginning July 1, 20            2027, 25% shall be transferred to the Criminal 21            Justice Information Projects Fund to be used for 22            the purposes of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew 23            Program to address economic development, violence 24            prevention services, re-entry services, youth 25            development, and civil legal aid, as defined by 26            Section 15 of the Public Interest Attorney   HB4443- 5 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1            Assistance Act. The Restore, Reinvest, and Renew 2            Program shall address these issues through 3            targeted investments and intervention programs and 4            promotion of an employment infrastructure and 5            capacity building related to the social 6            determinants of health in impacted community 7            areas. Expenditures for these purposes shall be 8            subject to appropriations.9            (ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, 10        the Department of Revenue shall first calculate the 11        total amount transferred under subdivision (i) of this 12        subparagraph (C) during the calendar year 2026. If the 13        amount of revenue transferred during the 2027 calendar 14        year exceeds the total amount transferred in the 2026 15        calendar year, the amount of that excess shall be 16        transferred from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to the 17        Illinois Future Fund for the purposes described in 18        Section 7-17 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 19        The remainder of the 25% under this subparagraph (C) 20        shall be transferred to the Criminal Justice 21        Information Projects Fund to be used for the purposes 22        of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program to address 23        economic development, violence prevention services, 24        re-entry services, youth development, and civil legal 25        aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 26        Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, Reinvest, and   HB4443- 6 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1        Renew Program shall address these issues through 2        targeted investments and intervention programs and 3        promotion of an employment infrastructure and capacity 4        building related to the social determinants of health 5        in impacted community areas.6            (iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, 7        20% shall be transferred to the Criminal Justice 8        Information Projects Fund to be used for the purposes 9        of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program to address 10        economic development, violence prevention services, 11        re-entry services, youth development, and civil legal 12        aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 13        Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, Reinvest, and 14        Renew Program shall address these issues through 15        targeted investments and intervention programs and 16        promotion of an employment infrastructure and capacity 17        building related to the social determinants of health 18        in impacted community areas. Additionally, 5% shall be 19        transferred to the Illinois Future Fund for the 20        purposes described in Section 7-17 of the Cannabis 21        Regulation and Tax Act.22            (iv) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, 23        15% shall be transferred to the Criminal Justice 24        Information Projects Fund to be used for the purposes 25        of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program to address 26        economic development, violence prevention services,   HB4443- 7 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1        re-entry services, youth development, and civil legal 2        aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 3        Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, Reinvest, and 4        Renew Program shall address these issues through 5        targeted investments and intervention programs and 6        promotion of an employment infrastructure and capacity 7        building related to the social determinants of health 8        in impacted community areas. Additionally, 10% shall 9        be transferred to the Illinois Future Fund for the 10        purposes described in Section 7-17 of the Cannabis 11        Regulation and Tax Act.12            (v) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030, 13        10% shall be transferred to the Criminal Justice 14        Information Projects Fund to be used for the purposes 15        of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program to address 16        economic development, violence prevention services, 17        re-entry services, youth development, and civil legal 18        aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 19        Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, Reinvest, and 20        Renew Program shall address these issues through 21        targeted investments and intervention programs and 22        promotion of an employment infrastructure and capacity 23        building related to the social determinants of health 24        in impacted community areas. Additionally, 15% shall 25        be transferred to the Illinois Future Fund for the 26        purposes described in Section 7-17 of the Cannabis   HB4443- 8 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1        Regulation and Tax Act.2            (vi) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, 3        5% shall be transferred to the Criminal Justice 4        Information Projects Fund to be used for the purposes 5        of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program to address 6        economic development, violence prevention services, 7        re-entry services, youth development, and civil legal 8        aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 9        Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, Reinvest, and 10        Renew Program shall address these issues through 11        targeted investments and intervention programs and 12        promotion of an employment infrastructure and capacity 13        building related to the social determinants of health 14        in impacted community areas. Additionally, 20% shall 15        be transferred to the Illinois Future Fund for the 16        purposes described in Section 7-17 of the Cannabis 17        Regulation and Tax Act.18            (vii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2032, 19        and for all subsequent fiscal years, 25% shall be 20        transferred to the Illinois Future Fund for the 21        purposes described in Section 7-17 of the Cannabis 22        Regulation and Tax Act.23            (D) 20% shall be transferred to the Department of 24        Human Services Community Services Fund, to be used to 25        address substance abuse and prevention and mental 26        health concerns, including treatment, education, and   HB4443- 9 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1        prevention to address the negative impacts of 2        substance abuse and mental health issues, including 3        concentrated poverty, violence, and the historical 4        overuse of criminal justice responses in certain 5        communities, on the individual, family, and community, 6        including federal, State, and local governments, 7        health care institutions and providers, and 8        correctional facilities. Expenditures for these 9        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.10            (E) 10% shall be transferred to the Budget 11        Stabilization Fund.12            (F) 35%, or any remaining balance, shall be 13        transferred to the General Revenue Fund.14    As soon as may be practical, but no later than 10 days 15after receipt, by the State Comptroller of the transfer 16certification provided for in this subsection (c) to be given 17to the State Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the 18State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 19transfer the respective amounts in accordance with the 20directions contained in such certification.21    (d) On July 1, 2019 the Department of Revenue shall 22certify to the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall 23transfer $5,000,000 from the Compassionate Use of Medical 24Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis Regulation Fund.25    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and 26except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Fund is not   HB4443- 10 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs, or any other 2fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would in any way transfer 3any amounts from this Fund into any other fund of the State.4    (f) The Cannabis Regulation Fund shall retain a balance of 5$1,000,000 for the purposes of administrative costs.6    (g) In Fiscal Year 2024 the allocations in subsection (c) 7of this Section shall be reviewed and adjusted if the General 8Assembly finds there is a greater need for funding for a 9specific purpose in the State as it relates to Public Act 10101-27.11(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 12    Section 10. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 13by adding Section 7-17 as follows: 14    (410 ILCS 705/7-17 new)15    Sec. 7-17. Illinois Future Fund and Direct Cash Assistance 16Program. 17    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:18    "Disproportionately impacted area" has the meaning 19ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of this Act.20    "Illinois Future Fund" means the special fund created 21under subsection (b) of this Section.22    "Qualifying individual" means an individual (1) who 23resides within a disproportionately impacted area, as defined 24in Section 1-10 of this Act, and (2) who is currently eligible   HB4443- 11 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1to receive benefits under SNAP or who was determined eligible 2for such benefits at any point during the 2025 calendar year.3    "SNAP" means the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 4Program. 5    (b) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 6to be known as the Illinois Future Fund. All moneys deposited 7into this Fund shall be exclusively used by the Department of 8Human Services for the purpose of the Direct Cash Assistance 9Program established under subsection (c) of this Section, 10including necessary administrative costs that shall not exceed 113% of the total funds allocated in any fiscal year.12    (c) The Department of Human Services shall establish and 13administer the Direct Cash Assistance Program to provide 14unconditional cash payments to qualifying individuals in 15disproportionately impacted areas.16        (1) The purpose of this Direct Cash Assistance Program 17    is to further the original legislative intent of the 18    Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program by directly providing 19    reparations and economic stability to the communities and 20    residents most impacted by historical economic 21    disinvestment and the criminalization of cannabis. 22        (2) Subject to available funds, each qualifying 23    individual shall receive a monthly cash payment of $500.24        (3) The Department of Human Services shall use 25    existing data from SNAP and shall establish a simple, 26    accessible process for individuals to verify their current   HB4443- 12 -LRB104 16268 BDA 29652 b1    or 2025 eligibility for SNAP benefits to qualify for the 2    Direct Cash Assistance Program.3        (4) If the total funds available in the Illinois 4    Future Fund are insufficient to provide the monthly cash 5    payments to all qualifying individuals, the Department 6    shall implement a fair, random lottery system to select 7    the recipients of the monthly payments. The Department 8    shall prioritize continuous payments to existing 9    recipients before conducting lotteries for new slots.10    (d) The Department of Human Services may adopt rules in 11conformity with this Section.